Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-123.01
Members; salary.

Each member of the Legislature shall receive a salary in an amount equal to the maximum authorized by the Constitution of Nebraska. Such salary shall be paid in equal monthly installments.

Laws 1960, Seventy-first Spec. Sess., c. 1, § 1, p. 59;

Laws 1968, Seventy-ninth Spec. Sess., c. 2, § 1, p. 3251;

Laws 1988, First Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 1.